Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 11 Air Carriers

39-11-1.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this chapter:

“Airports and landing fields” means all airports and landing fields other than those owned by the state.

“Charter carrier” means and includes all carriers for hire or compensation by air within this state not included in the definition of the term common carrier.

“Common carrier” means and includes all carriers for hire or compensation by air that operate, or seek to operate, over fixed routes or between fixed termini within the state.

“Person” means and includes any individual, co-partnership, association, corporation, or other form of organization and their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-1

.

39-11-2.
Purpose.

It is hereby declared to be the purpose and policy of the legislature in enacting this chapter, to confer upon the public utilities administrator the power and authority and to make it his or her duty to supervise and regulate the transportation of persons and property by intrastate aircraft through the air between termini located within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-2

.

39-11-3.
Operations requiring certificate of convenience and necessity.

Any person seeking to engage in the operation, or to extend a present operation, as an intrastate common carrier of persons or property by aircraft, shall first obtain a certificate of convenience and necessity from the public utilities administrator in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-3

.

39-11-4.
Transportation of mail.

No certificate shall be required for the transportation of United States mail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-4

.

39-11-5.
Application for certificate — Fee.

Application for a certificate shall be in writing and shall contain such information as the administrator may require. All applications for a certificate shall be in the form prescribed by the administrator and shall be accompanied by a filing fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-5

; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 31.

39-11-6.
Hearings on certificate.

Upon the filing of an application for a certificate, the administrator shall fix a time and place for the hearing on the application and shall cause notice of the filing of the application and of the hearing on the application to be given by mail not less than ten (10) days, exclusive of the date of mailing, before the hearing, addressed to all holders of certificates, and applicants therefor whose operations or proposed operations would be affected by the granting of the proposed certificate, and upon any other person deemed by the administrator to have an interest in the proceeding. All interested persons shall have the right to appear and take part in all proceedings before the administrator either in person or by counsel. All hearings, investigations, and inquiries before the administrator shall be governed by rules to be adopted and prescribed by the administrator, and in the hearings and investigations and inquiries, the administrator shall not be bound by the technical rules of evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-6

.

39-11-7.
Duty to hear interested parties — Evidence as to other forms of transportation.

The public utilities administrator is hereby authorized and empowered, and it is hereby made his or her duty, upon the filing of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, to hear all interested parties. The administrator shall not receive or consider evidence with respect to other forms of transportation, or the service, or facilities thereof, nor shall the administrator consider such factors in determining whether public convenience and necessity requires the proposed operations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-7

.

39-11-8.
Issuance of certificate — Proof required.

The administrator may issue a certificate granting the application in whole or in part and may impose such terms and conditions as he or she may deem proper in the public interest. The applicant for the certificate shall be entitled to the certificate only upon showing by competent evidence that the public convenience and necessity requires the proposed service or operation and that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to provide the service proposed and found to be required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-8

.

39-11-9.
Service of orders — Rehearing.

Orders of the administrator shall be served upon all parties to the respective proceedings and shall become effective thirty (30) days after the service. Any of the parties to any hearing before the administrator may, upon proper petition, be granted a rehearing. The administrator shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the rehearing. If any rehearing is granted within thirty (30) days after the issuance of an order, then the order shall not become effective until thirty (30) days after the determination of the administrator following the rehearing proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-9

.

39-11-10.
Continuation of certificate — Transfer — Rights conferred.

All certificates issued by the administrator shall continue in force and effect until surrendered or revoked for cause. No certificate may be transferred except upon proper application and hearing, and upon a finding by the administrator that the transfer is consistent with the public interest. No certificate shall confer any proprietary, property, or exclusive rights in the use of any airspace, airport, or other air navigation facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-10

.

39-11-11.
Rates, fares, and charges.

All common carriers subject to this chapter shall, before engaging in business, file with the administrator and keep open to public inspection at its offices and terminals schedules showing all rates, fares, and charges for transportation of passengers, or property, between different points on its route or routes, and also between points on its own route and on the routes of other common carriers, when a through route and joint rate have been established. No intrastate aircraft common carrier shall accept or receive any person or property for transportation until the requirements of this chapter have been complied with, and no carrier shall charge, demand, collect, or receive a greater or less or different remuneration therewith than the rates, fares, and charges that have been legally established and filed with the administrator; nor shall any carrier refund or remit in any manner or by any device any portion of the rates, fares, and charges so established. The administrator is vested with the power and authority to supervise, regulate, and fix, alter, and determine just, fair, reasonable, and sufficient rates, fares, charges, and classifications. No order of the administrator affecting rates, fares, and charges shall issue except after notice and hearing on the same, and any interested party may appear and take part in any proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-11

.

39-11-12.
Issuance of securities.

Any corporation or association, presently existing, and any that may hereafter be organized or authorized to do business under the laws of this state, or any lessee, or trustee, or any person or persons owning, conducting, managing, operating, or controlling any air carrier engaged in intrastate commerce, may issue stocks and bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, payable at periods of more than twelve (12) months after the date thereof, only when there shall have been secured from the administrator an order authorizing the issue. Any person, corporation, or association desiring authority to issue stocks or bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall make written application therefor to the administrator in such form as the administrator may require. The administrator shall thereafter make such inquiry or investigation as he or she may deem necessary, and the administrator may hold such hearings and examine such witnesses’ books, papers, documents, or contracts as he or she may deem of importance, for the purpose of enabling him or her to reach a determination. The administrator shall authorize the issuance of the stocks or bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, if he or she shall be shown that the funds to be so realized are necessary for the acquisition of property, the construction, completion, extension, or improvement of facilities, or for the improvement or maintenance of service, or for the discharge or lawful refunding of obligations, or for any other proper purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-12

.

39-11-13.
Certification of established common carriers.

Any common carrier in operation on or before April 23, 1944, shall be entitled to a certificate of convenience and necessity as a matter of right, and without proof of public convenience and necessity, authorizing it to continue operations over the route or routes and between the points it had been serving in intrastate commerce on or prior to April 23, 1944.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-13

.

39-11-14.
Revocation, suspension, or modification of certificate.

Upon application of any person, or upon his or her own motion, and upon at least ten (10) days’ notice to the parties affected thereby, and for good cause, and after an opportunity for a hearing on the application, the administrator may revoke, suspend, alter, amend, or modify any and all of his or her orders and findings, but no certificate shall be amended, altered, modified, revoked, suspended, or impaired except after like notice and opportunity to be heard and upon clear proof of good, just, and sufficient cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-14

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 112.

39-11-15.
Authority for abandonment or suspension of service.

No air carrier shall abandon any route or part thereof for which a certificate has been issued by the administrator unless, upon the application of the air carrier and after notice and a hearing by the administrator, he or she shall find abandonment to be in the public interest. Any interested person may appear and be heard in opposition or in support of any abandonment. The administrator may, by regulation or otherwise, authorize such temporary suspension of service as may be in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-15

.

39-11-16.
Abandonment as ground for revocation.

Failure to commence operations within the time prescribed in the certificate or order of the administrator, or discontinuance of operations for more than sixty (60) days, shall be deemed just cause for revocation, but shall not be regarded as the sole cause for such action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-16

.

39-11-17.
Certification of charter carriers — Provisions applicable.

Any person seeking to engage in the operation, or to extend a present operation, as a charter carrier, shall first obtain a certificate of public convenience and advantage from the public utilities administrator in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of §§

39-11-4

—

39-11-10

,

39-11-14

—

39-11-16

and

39-11-23

, shall apply to all applications and all charter carriers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-17

.

39-11-18.
Certification of established charter carriers.

Any charter carrier in operation on or before April 23, 1944, shall be entitled to a certificate of public convenience and advantage as a matter of right and without proof of public convenience and advantage; provided, however, that any charter carrier temporarily prevented from carrying on any authorized operations because of the emergency created by World War II, shall be considered as having been in operation on April 23, 1944, for the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-18

.

39-11-19.
Application by interstate carrier.

To aid in promoting and developing interstate transportation of persons and property by aircraft, any holder of a certificate of convenience and necessity issued by the federal Civil Aeronautics Board or any other appropriate federal governmental authority may apply to the administrator for a certificate for that portion of its interstate operation that is within the boundaries of this state, upon the forms and in the manner prescribed by the administrator for applications.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-19

.

39-11-20.
Certification of interstate carrier.

Within a reasonable time after the filing of an application, the administrator shall issue a certificate to the applicant without a hearing thereon for that portion of the interstate operation that is within this state, upon such terms and conditions as he or she may deem proper and in the public interest, but the terms and conditions shall not conflict with those under which the federal certificate is issued. Any rights conferred upon the holder of any certificate issued under the provisions of §§

39-11-19

—

39-11-21

as well as the terms and conditions applicable thereto, shall apply only to intrastate operations performed in conjunction with interstate operations under the federal certificate, and the certificate issued under this section shall not be construed to grant to the holder thereof the right to operate otherwise as an intrastate carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-20

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 112.

39-11-21.
Notice to interstate carriers of proceedings.

For the purpose of receiving due notice of all proceedings before the administrator relating to aeronautics, the administrator is hereby authorized and directed to notify all holders of certificates issued under §§

39-11-19

and

39-11-20

in the same manner as he or she is directed to notify holders of certificates issued under other provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-21

.

39-11-22.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-22

; Repealed by P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 18.

39-11-23.
Penalty for violations.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for a term not exceeding one year, or shall be so fined and imprisoned.

For the purposes of this chapter, each day during which any violation shall occur shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-23

.

39-11-24 — 39-11-26.
[Repealed.]

39-11-27.
Severability.

Each section of this chapter and each part of each section is hereby declared to be an independent section, and the holding of any section or sections or part or parts thereof to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1500, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

39-11-27

.